Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 10, article 7, section 8, is amended to read: Sec. 8. deleted text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET; CONTINGENT REDUCTION INdeleted text end SPECIAL EDUCATION deleted text begin AID APPROPRIATIONSdeleted text end new text begin RECOMMENDATIONS BY BLUE RIBBON COMMISSIONnew text end . deleted text begin (a) When preparing the forecast for state revenues and expenditures under Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.103, the commissioner of management and budget must assume a $250,000,000 reduction in the appropriations for special education aid for the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, and for each subsequent biennium, until the end of the legislative session that enacts a budget for the Department of Education for the biennium beginning July 1, 2027. deleted text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end Upon enactment of a budget for the Department of Education for the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, the legislature must identify enacted provisions that were recommended by or based on the recommendation of the Blue Ribbon Commission on Special Education. deleted text begin (c) To the extent the net savings attributable to the provisions in paragraph (b) are less than $250,000,000 for the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, and for each subsequent biennium, the commissioner of education must reduce the special education cross subsidy aid factor under Minnesota Statutes, section 125A.76, subdivision 2e, paragraph (b), as necessary to reduce biennial appropriations for special education aid by an amount equal to the difference between the savings identified in paragraph (b) and the $250,000,000 of biennial savings assumed in paragraph (a). The commissioner of education must notify the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education of any reduction in the cross subsidy aid factor under this paragraph. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end